Massachusetts, session 194th, S1846.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the Generals Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, in line 327, after the word “supervisor”, the following words:-
associate probation officers, probation officer, assistance chief probation officer, senior
community corrections probation officer, and day reporting center probation officer, first
assistant chief probation officer, court officer I, court officer II, court officer III, assistant and
chief court officer, associate court officer, and court officer-in-charge.
of 1